Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
INTERPLEADER

§634-11 Interpleader; application for order
by sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil process
server. [Repeal and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.]
When, in the execution of process against goods and chattels issued by or
under the authority of the courts of the State, by reason of claims made to
such goods and chattels by assignees of bankrupts and other persons not being
the parties against whom such process had issued, whereby the sheriff, deputy
sheriffs, police officers, or independent civil process servers from the
department of public safety's list under section 353C-10 are exposed to the
hazard and expense of actions, any such claim shall be made to any goods or
chattels taken or intended to be taken in execution under any such process or
to the proceeds or value thereof, it shall be lawful for the court, out of
which the execution shall have issued, or any judge thereof, upon application
of the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil process
server made before or after the return of such process, and as well before as
after any action brought against the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer,
or independent civil process server to call before it or the judge by rule,
order, or summons, as well the party issuing such process as the party making
the claim. Thereupon the court or judge shall, for the adjustment of the
claims and the relief and protection of the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police
officer, or independent civil process server, make such rules, orders, and
decisions as shall appear to be just according to the circumstances of the
case. The costs of all such proceedings shall be in the discretion of the
court or judge. [L 1876, c 33, §5; RL 1925, §2872; RL 1935, §4061; RL 1945,
§10043; RL 1955, §230-13; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §634-43; ren HRS §634-11; am
L 1980, c 232, §32; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11;
am L 2012, c 142, §6; am L 2013, c 116, §§8, 25(7)]

Case Notes

Did not apply to district courts under prior law. 6 H. 254
(1879).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next